Illinois, session 104th, HB5789.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Food Handling Regulation Enforcement Act is 5amended by adding Section 3.10 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 625/3.10 new)7    Sec. 3.10. Volunteers at early childhood facilities and 8early childhood programs. This Act does not apply to 9volunteers at an early childhood facility or early childhood 10program who only participate in the serving of food and do not 11participate in the preparation of food. In this Section, 12"volunteer" means an individual who chooses to provide 13services to benefit a community, organization, or cause, 14motivated primarily by civic duty, purpose, or altruism rather 15than standard market-rate economic gain. In this Section, 16"volunteer" includes individuals performing services on either 17a paid or unpaid basis.